Hawaii statutes.
[§414-482] Application to qualified foreign
corporations. A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in
this State on July 1, 2001 is subject to this chapter but is not required to
obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under this chapter.
[L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"July 1, 2001" substituted for "the effective
date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next